ess.foma
#!/usr/bin/env foma -f

!==============
! MISC SYMBOLS
!==============
! "^"  morpheme boundary
! .#.  word boundary


!======
! SETS
!======

define C          [ f | g | h | k | l | m |
                    n | p | q | r | s | t |
                    v | w | y | z |
                    %{t%} | %{g%} | %{k%} ];

define Stop       [ p   | t   | k   | q   |
                    k w | q w | %{t%} ];

define VoicedC    [ g h w | g h |
                    v | l | z   | y | r | g | w |
                    m | n | n g | n g w ];

define UnvoicedC  [ p   | t   | k   | q   |
                    k w | q w |
                    f   | s   | h   |
                    l l | r r | g g | w h | g h h | g h h w |
                    m m | n n | n g n g   | n g n g w ];

define MultiCharC [ n g n g w |
                    n g n g   | g h h w | g h h |
                    g h w     | n g w   |
                    g g       | g h     | k w   | l l | m m |
                    n g       | n n     | r r   | q w | w h ];

define FullVowel  [ a | i | u | A | I | U ];
define V          [ e | FullVowel ];

define Allomorph  [ %{E%} | %{I%} | %{GI%} | %{AI%} ];


!================
! GUESSED ROOTS
!================

define AnyC [ UnvoicedC | VoicedC ];
define AnyV [ a | a a | i | i i | u | u u | e ];

define GuessedRootAIU                  [ "(GUESS)":0 ]   (AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]*  AnyC [ a a | i i | u u | a | i | u ] ;
define GuessedRootGWGHW                [ "(GUESS)":0 ] ( (AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]*  AnyC )      AnyV            [ g | w | g h w ] .o.
                                                                       [                       ?*         ? ?               ? ]; ! Ensure that the root is at least 3 characters long

define GuessedRootPredictablyStrongGH  [ "(GUESS)":0 ]  ((AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]*  AnyC)[ a a | i i | u u ]    [ g h ] ;
define GuessedRootUnexpectedlyStrongGH [ "(GUESS)":0 ]   (AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]*  AnyC [ a | i | u       ]    [ g h "*" ]:[   g   h ] ;
define GuessedRootWeakGH               [ "(GUESS)":0 ]   (AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]*  AnyC [ a | i | u       ]    [ g h     ]:[ %{g%} h ] ;
define GuessedRootFullVGH              [ "(GUESS)":0 ]   (AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]*  AnyC [ a | i | u       ]      g h      ;
define GuessedRootEDrop                [ "(GUESS)":0 ] [[(AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]+                              AnyC e ]  |
                                                                                          [ (AnyC) [a a | i i | u u | e ] AnyC e ]] ;
define GuessedRootEHop                 [ "(GUESS)":0 ]                                       (AnyC)     FullVowel          AnyC e ;
define GuessedRootSemiFinalE           [ "(GUESS)":0 ]   (AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]*  AnyC                     e  [ g | g h ] ;
define GuessedRootTE                   [ "(GUESS)":0 ] [ (AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]* [ t ]:[ %{t%} ]          e ] .o. 
                                                                       [  ?*   ?               ?                      ? ]; ! Ensure that the root is at least 3 characters long
define GuessedRootSpecialTE            [ "(GUESS)":0 ] [ (AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]* [ t ]:[ %{t%} ]          e [ "*" ]:0 ] .o. 
                                                                       [  ?*   ?               ?                      ? ]; ! Ensure that the root is at least 3 characters long
define GuessedRootFinalE               [ "(GUESS)":0 ] [[ (AnyV (AnyC)) [ AnyC AnyV (AnyC) ]*  AnyC                     e ] .o.
                                                                        [  ?*   ?               ?                       ? ] ]; ! Ensure that the root is at least 3 characters long

define UppercaseName          A <- a , I <- i , U <- u , E <- e ,
                              P <- p , T <- t , K <- k , Q <- q ,
                              L <- l , Z <- z , Y <- y , R <- r ,
                              G <- g , W <- w , S <- s , F <- f ,
                              S <- s , M <- m , N <- n , "V" <- v  || "(NAME)" _ ;
                              
define UppercaseFirstLetter   a -> A , i -> I , u -> U , e -> E ,
                              p -> P , t -> T , k -> K , q -> Q ,
                              l -> L , z -> Z , y -> Y , r -> R ,
                              g -> G , w -> W , s -> S , f -> F ,
                              s -> S , m -> M , n -> N , v -> "V"  || .#. _ ;
                              
define GuessedName [ "(GUESS)" "(NAME)" <- "(GUESS)" ];
                     
define GuessedNameAIU                  [ UppercaseName .o. GuessedName .o. GuessedRootAIU                  .o. UppercaseFirstLetter ];
define GuessedNameGWGHW                [ UppercaseName .o. GuessedName .o. GuessedRootGWGHW                .o. UppercaseFirstLetter ];
define GuessedNameWeakGH               [ UppercaseName .o. GuessedName .o. GuessedRootWeakGH               .o. UppercaseFirstLetter ];
define GuessedNameUnexpectedlyStrongGH [ UppercaseName .o. GuessedName .o. GuessedRootUnexpectedlyStrongGH .o. UppercaseFirstLetter ];
define GuessedNamePredictablyStrongGH  [ UppercaseName .o. GuessedName .o. GuessedRootPredictablyStrongGH  .o. UppercaseFirstLetter ];
define GuessedNameTE                   [ UppercaseName .o. GuessedName .o. GuessedRootTE                   .o. UppercaseFirstLetter ];
define GuessedNameSemiFinalE           [ UppercaseName .o. GuessedName .o. GuessedRootSemiFinalE           .o. UppercaseFirstLetter ];
define GuessedNameEDrop                [ UppercaseName .o. GuessedName .o. GuessedRootEDrop                .o. UppercaseFirstLetter ];
define GuessedNameEHop                 [ UppercaseName .o. GuessedName .o. GuessedRootEHop                 .o. UppercaseFirstLetter ];

define PossibleYupikName  [ GuessedNameAIU.l                  |
                            GuessedNameGWGHW.l                |
                            GuessedNameWeakGH.l               |
                            GuessedNameUnexpectedlyStrongGH.l |
                            GuessedNamePredictablyStrongGH.l  |
                            GuessedNameTE.l                   |
                            GuessedNameSemiFinalE.l           |
                            GuessedNameEDrop.l                |
                            GuessedNameEHop.l                 ];

define LowercaseForeignAlphabet [ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u |  v  | w | x | y | z ];
define UppercaseForeignAlphabet [ A | B | "C" | D | E | F | G | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R | S | T | U | "V" | W | X | Y | Z ];

define GuessedForeignName [ "(GUESS)" "(NAME)" "(FOREIGN)" ]:0 UppercaseForeignAlphabet [ UppercaseForeignAlphabet | LowercaseForeignAlphabet | "\u02BC" ]* ("-");

define GuessedForeignWord [ "(GUESS)" "(FOREIGN)" ]:0 LowercaseForeignAlphabet [ LowercaseForeignAlphabet | "\u02BC" ]* ("-");

define GuessedForeign [ GuessedForeignName | GuessedForeignWord ];


!=========
! NUMBERS 
!=========

! NOTE: The Number lexicon does slightly overgenerate because of numerals.txt
!       Digits are permitted to be followed by a dash or nothing, so "1" and "1-" are both valid forms on the lower side 
!       Digits are also encoded to inflect as vowel-ending and consonant-ending roots. I have not seen enough examples to make a case for one over the other
!       (Emily 2021-03-17)

define Digit [ "0" | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ];

define Number ("$") Digit+ ("," Digit^3) ("." Digit^2);


!==========================================
! FILTERS
!  Filters out invalid strings according to
!  de Reuse (1994) and awareness of common
!  analyzer mistakes.
!==========================================

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! 1. SHORTHAND DEFINITIONS 
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~

!-----------
! mood tags
!-----------
define Concessive         [ "^" ["[Conc.Intr]" | "[Cond.Trns]"] ];

define Conditional        [ "^" ["[Cond.Intr]" | "[Cond.Trns]"] ];

define Consequential      [ "^" ["[Cnsq1.Intr]" | "[Cnsq1.Trns]" | "[Cnsq2.Intr]" | "[Cnsq2.Trns]"] ];

define Contemporative     [ "^" ["[Ctmp.Intr]" | "[Ctmp.Trns]"] ];

define Indicative         [ "^" ["[Ind.Intr]" | "[Ind.Trns]"] ];

define Participial        [ "^" ["[Ptcp.Intr]" | "[Ptcp.Trns]"] ];

define ParticipialOblique [ "^" ["[PtcpObl.Intr]" | "[PtcpObl.Trns]"] ];

define Precessive         [ "^" ["[Prec.Intr]" | "[Prec.Trns]"] ];

define Subordinative      [ "^" ["[Sbrd.Intr]" | "[Sbrd.Trns]"] ];

define VolitiveOfFear     [ "^" "[Volitive.Of.Fear]" ];

define Optative [ "^" ["[Opt.Pres.Intr]"     | "[Opt.Pres.Trns]"         |
                       "[Opt.Pres.Intr.2Sg]" | "[Opt.Pres.Trns.2Sg.3Sg]" |
                       "[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Sg.3Pl]" | "[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Pl.3Pl]" | "[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Du.3Pl]" |
                       "[Opt.Neg.Pres.Intr]" | "[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns]"     |
                       "[Opt.Fut.Intr]"      | "[Opt.Fut.Trns]"          |
                       "[Opt.Fut.Neg.Intr]"  | "[Opt.Fut.Neg.Trns]"]
                ];

!-------------------- 
! negative postbases
!-------------------- 
define Nghite   [ "^" "@" "–" {nghite} "(V→V)" ];
define Negative [ "^" [ "@" "~" ":" "(ng)" {igate} "(V→V)"    |
                        "@" {laaghigate} "(V→V)"              |
                        "–" {pagigate} "(V→V)"                |
                        "–" {qiigate} "(V→V)"                 |
                        "~" ":" "(ng)" {ite} "(V→V)"          |
                        "–" {pagite} "(V→V)"                  | 
                        "–" {ketiite} "(V→V)"                 |
                        "–" {llgite} "(V→V)"                  |
                        "–" {llgiite} "(V→V)"                 |
                        "@" "~" ":" "(i/u)" {mangite} "(V→V)" |
                        "–" {pagumangite} "(V→V)"             |
                        "@" "~f" {niite} "(V→V)"              |
                        "@" "~f" {naanghite} "(V→V)"          |
                        "–" {pagnaanghite} "(V→V)"            |
                        "@" "–" {nghite} "(V→V)"              |
                        "+" {panghite} "(V→V)"                |
                        "–" {panghite} "(V→V)"                |
                        "+" {pagunghite} "(V→V)"              |
                        "–" {pagunghite} "(V→V)"              |
                        "–" {llghite} "(V→V)"                 |
                        "+" {pagningite} "(V→V)"              |
                        "+" {yaghqiite} "(V→V)"               |
                        "@" "~f" "–" {yiite} "(V→V)"          |
                        "+" {yugniite} "(V→V)"                |
                        "@" "~f" {nanigh} "(V→V)"             |
                        "@" "~f" {nanighqe} "(V→V)"           ]
                ];

!-----------------
! modal postbases
!-----------------
define Kayugu     [ "^" "@" "~" "–" "(g)" {kayugu} "(V→V)" ];
define Naqe       [ "^" "~f" {naqe} "(V→V)" ];
define Naqlaatagh [ "^" "~f" {naqlaatagh} "(V→V)" ];
define Qaghnaqe   [ "^" "–" {qaghnaqe} "(V→V)" ];
define Na         [ "^" "@" "~f" {na} "(V→V)" ];
define Naqngu     [ "^" "@" "~f" {naqngu} "(V→V)" ];
define Yaghqaqe   [ "^" "@" "~f" {yaghqaqe} "(V→V)" ];
define Yaghqau    [ "^" "@" "~f" {yaghqau} "(V→V)" ];
define Nayagh     [ "^" "@" "~f" {nayagh} "(V→V)" ];
define Qaghnayagh [ "^" "–" {qaghnagyh} "(V→V)" ];
define ModalPostbase [ Kayugu   | Naqe        | Naqlaatagh |
                       Qaghnaqe | Na | Naqngu | Yaghqaqe   |
                       Yaghqau  | Nayagh      | Qaghnayagh ];

!---------------------
! past tense postbases
!---------------------
define Kau  [ "^" "@" "~" "–" "(g)" {kau}  "(V→V)" ]; 
define Kaqe [ "^" "@" "~" "–" "(g)" {kaqe} "(V→V)" ];
define Ma   [ "^" "@" "~" ":" "(i/u)" {ma} "(V→V)" ];
define PastTensePostbase [ Kau | Kaqe | Ma ];
